Utah statutes.
32A-1-121 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Reports.

(1)  The department shall report to the governor on the administration of this title, as the governor may require, and shall submit an annual report to the governor not later than November 30, for the fiscal year ending June 30 of the year in which the report is made.  The report shall contain:

(a)  a statement of the nature and amount of the business transacted by the department during the year;

(b)  a statement of the department's assets and liabilities including a profit and loss account, and other accounts and matters necessary to show the results of operations of the department for the year;

(c)  general information and remarks on the application of this title in the state; and

(d)  any other information requested by the governor.

(2)  Copies of the report shall be submitted to the Legislature.

